xfst/phonology.xfst
! "dan", "das", "dash", "dazhi" (and the VAI dazhe), "dood", "dapin" (as in "dapine") or "daa" (specifically the stem), then add "en-" instead of the usualy initial change ablaut.
! endaso-biboonagizid 
define ChCnjEn "<ChCnj>" -> {en} || (PREBD) _ (PREBD) [ {dan} | {das} | {daa} SUFBD | {dazhe} SUFBD | {dazhi} | {dood} | {dapin} ] ; 

! Changed conjunct rules
! The weirdness of the rule is on purpose! 
! hfst cannot compile longest match in the way we had before. 
! So we needed to create temporary multicharacter symbols.
define ChCnjV [{ii} (->) iyii1, {oo} (->) oyoo1, e (->) eye1 || "<ChCnj>" [PREBD | Cons]* _ ] .o. [{aa} -> ayaa1 , {ii} -> aa1, {oo} -> waa1 || "<ChCnj>" [PREBD | Cons]* _ ] .o. [ a -> e , e -> {aye}  , i -> e , o -> {we} || "<ChCnj>" [PREBD | Cons]* _ ] .o. [ iyii1 -> {iyii}, eye1 -> {eye}, oyoo1 -> {oyoo}, ayaa1 -> {ayaa}, aa1 -> {aa}, waa1 -> {waa} ];

define ChCnjDefault "<ChCnj>" -> 0 ;

! Tense-tensing: Lenis consonants ("b", "d", "j", "g", "z", "zh") are strengthened to
! the fortis counterpart ("p", "t", "ch", "k", "s", "sh") following the past tense preverbs
! (gii-/gii'-) and desiderative future tense preverbs (wii-/wii'-).
! This is triggered by a special character <T>.
! Now made optional, since it really can be variable, even in the most prescriptive writing/speaking
define tenseTensing [ b (->) p , d (->) t , j (->) {ch} , g (->) k , {zh} (->) {sh} || "<T>" "-" (PREBD) _ ] .o. [ z (->) s || "<T>" "-" (PREBD) _ ];

! Clean up rules
define emptyFilter [? - "<EMPTYLEX>"]* ;
define cleanUp [ BD | "<T>" ] -> 0 ; 


! Composition, etc. Needs a lot more documentation

!read lexc all.lexc
!define Lexicon

read regex [!emptyFilter .o.
            !cleanUp.i ] .o. Lexicon .o. [ 
						! Suffix Rules
     	   	     	 	n1Rule .o. ! Must precede vowelDeletion and nDeletion
						nDeletion .o. ! Must follow n1Rule
				       	s1Rule .o. ! Must precede vowelDeletion	
						iInsertion .o. ! Must precede nasalAssimilation	   
						dPalatalizationGe .o. ! Must precede iInsertionGe
						tPalatalizationGe .o. 
						iInsertionGe .o.
     	   	            nasalAssimilation .o.
						iBeforeAmawDeletion .o.
				       	awaaRule .o.
				       	awooRule .o.
						awowRule .o.
				       	woRule1 .o. ! Must precede vowelDeletion
				       	woRule2 .o.	! Must precede vowelDeletion
						woRule3 .o.	! Must precede vowelDeletion
						izhiShortVPreservation .o. ! Must precede vowelDeletion and w2Deletion; must follow n1Rule
						glottaloMetathesis .o. ! Must precede vowelDeletion	
						wMetathesis .o. ! Must precede w1Deletion	
						ywRule .o.	  
						angongRule .o.     
			            vowelDeletion .o. ! Must precede w1Deletion, w2Deletion, and y1Deletion; must follow n1Rule, s1Rule, woRule1, and woRule2
			            w1Deletion .o. ! Must precede dDeletion; must follow vowelDeletion
				       	w2Deletion .o. ! Must precede LengthenV; must follow vowelDeletion
                       	dDeletion .o. ! Must follow w1Deletion
						y2Deletion .o.   
                        y1hRule .o. ! Must precede y1Deletion
						yhRule .o.
				       	y1Deletion .o. ! Must precede hDeletion; must follow vowelDeletion and y1hRule
				      	hDeletion .o. ! Must follow y1Deletion
						LengthenV .o. ! Must follow w2Deletion
				       	irrDimVVny .o.
     	   	     	 	irrDiman .o.
						irrDimAnimosh .o.
						ayDeletion .o.
						ningwDeletion .o.
						iwiiRule .o.
						irrOgiin .o.
						pejorativePalatalization1 .o.
						pejorativePalatalization2 .o.
						pejorativePalatalization3 .o.
						izhiInverseDel .o.
						! Prefix Rules							       
			           	DepPrefixiInsertionDi .o.
						DepPrefixOInsertion .o.
						DepPrefixWtoOOptional .o.
						DepPrefixWDeletion .o.
					   	DepPrefixWtoO .o.
						PrefixYInsertion .o.
			           	PrefixDInsertion .o.					   
				       	PrefixNDInsertion .o.
				       	PrefixDDeletion .o.
				       	PrefixIND .o.
				       	PrefixMInsertion .o.
						PrefixMOnly .o.
				       	PrefixNInsertion .o.
						PrefixNOnly .o.
						PrefixNInitialDeletion .o.
			           	prefixOLengthening .o.
						ChCnjExceptions .o.
						ChCnjEn .o.
				       	ChCnjV .o.
				       	tenseTensing .o.
						gadaRule .o.
						! Cleanup rules						
				       	defaultRules .o.
				       	ChCnjDefault .o.
				       	emptyFilter
                                        ] ;

define RulesNoCleanup ;

read regex RulesNoCleanup .o. cleanUp ;
